Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 Powers and Duties Generally

53-7-1.
General powers and duties of personal representative; additional powers.

The duties and powers of the personal representative commence upon qualification. Such powers relate back to give acts performed by the personal representative prior to qualification that are beneficial to the estate the same effect as those acts performed after qualification. The personal representative may ratify and accept on behalf of the estate acts that are done by others that would have been proper acts for the personal representative. A personal representative is a fiduciary who, in addition to the specific duties imposed by law, is under a general duty to settle the estate as expeditiously and with as little sacrifice of value as is reasonable under all of the circumstances. The personal representative shall use the authority and powers conferred by law, by the terms of any will under which the personal representative is acting, by any order of court in proceedings to which the personal representative is a party, and by the rules generally applicable to fiduciaries to act in the best interests of all persons who are interested in the estate and with due regard for their respective rights.

As part of the petition for letters testamentary, letters of administration with the will annexed, or letters of administration or by separate petition, the beneficiaries of a testate estate or the heirs of an intestate estate may, by unanimous consent, authorize but not require the probate court to grant to the personal representative any of the powers contained in Code Section 53-12-261; provided, however, that the grant by the probate court of the powers provided by paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-261 shall not authorize the personal representative to bind the estate by any warranty in any conveyance or contract in violation of subsection (a) of Code Section 53-8-14.

With respect to any beneficiary of a testate estate or heir of an intestate estate who is not sui juris, the consent required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be given by such beneficiary’s or heir’s duly acting conservator or guardian. The personal representative of a deceased beneficiary or heir shall be authorized to consent on behalf of such deceased beneficiary or heir.

The grant of powers provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be ordered only after publication of a citation in the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made and only after the time for filing objections has elapsed either without any objection being timely filed, or if any such objection is timely filed, upon each such objection being dismissed or withdrawn. The citation shall be sufficient if it states generally that the petition requests that powers contained in Code Section 53-12-261 be granted.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 29; Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 18/SB 131; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-36/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (b), which read: “(b)
As part of the petition for letters testamentary or letters of administration or by separate petition, the beneficiaries of a testate estate or the heirs of an intestate estate may, by unanimous consent, authorize but not require the probate court to grant to the personal representative any of the powers contained in Code Section 53-12-261. With respect to any beneficiary or heir who is not sui juris, the consent may be given by the guardian. The personal representative of a deceased beneficiary or heir shall be authorized to consent on behalf of that beneficiary or heir. The grant of powers shall only be ordered after publication of a citation and without any objection being filed. The citation shall be sufficient if it states generally that the petition requests that powers contained in Code Section 53-12-261 be granted.”

Law reviews.

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

53-7-2.
Administration of entire estate; distribution of residuum.

The personal representative shall be entitled to possess and administer the entire estate. If, after payment of debts and satisfaction of testamentary gifts, there are assets not given under the will, such assets shall be distributed to the heirs of the decedent as if the decedent had died intestate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note, “Not Just For Kids:
Why Georgia’s Statutory Disinheritance of Deadbeat Parents Should Extend to Intestate Adults,” see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 867 (2009).

53-7-3.
Powers and immunities of administrator with will annexed.

An administrator with the will annexed shall have all rights, powers, privileges, exemptions, and immunities of the executor, including the dispensation by the testator of the necessity of making inventory and returns.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-4.
Powers of temporary administrators pending appointment of personal representative and executors pending litigation of caveats to wills.

Temporary administrators, pending the appointment of a personal representative, and executors, pending litigation of caveats to wills, are authorized to carry out existing contracts of the decedent, carry on the business of the decedent, and do such acts as are necessary for the protection and preservation of the estate provided proper orders are secured from the probate court after due notice to all parties in interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-5.
Powers, duties, and liabilities if more than one personal representative; safe deposit boxes or receptacles.

If more than one personal representative is qualified and unless the will provides otherwise:

The personal representatives must act by their unanimous action; provided, however, that while a personal representative is unable to act because of inaccessibility, illness, or other incapacity, or when a vacancy occurs for any other reason, the remaining personal representatives may act as if they were the only personal representatives if necessary to administer the estate; and

The personal representatives may delegate in writing to one or more of them the authority to act for all of them; provided, however, that such delegation must satisfy the requirements of Code Sections 10-6B-5 and 10-6B-40, and that all the personal representatives remain liable for the actions of the personal representative who is authorized to act.

If more than one personal representative is qualified and unless the will provides otherwise, a personal representative is liable for a breach committed by another personal representative:

By participating in a breach of fiduciary duty committed by the other personal representative;

By approving, knowingly acquiescing in, or concealing a breach of fiduciary duty committed by the other personal representative;

By negligently enabling the other personal representative to commit a breach of fiduciary duty; or

By neglecting to take reasonable steps to compel the other personal representative to redress a breach of fiduciary duty in a case where the personal representative knows or reasonably should have known of the breach of trust.

When safe-deposit boxes or receptacles are leased or rented to fiduciaries, including executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, custodians, receivers, and the like, the fiduciary or fiduciaries, as lessee or renter, may authorize the entering of the box or receptacle by one or fewer than all of them or by any other person without the presence or consent of the fiduciary or fiduciaries. Upon receipt of the written authorization, the bank or lessor may without liability authorize access to the box or receptacle in accordance with such authorization. Upon cancellation of the authorization, the bank or lessor may require the presence of all lessees or renters for access.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-37/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “such delegation must satisfy the requirements of Code Sections 10-6B-5 and 10-6B-40, and that” in paragraph (a)(2); and substituted “safe-deposit” for “safe deposit” in subsection (c).

Cross references.

Procedure for opening safe-deposit box when depositor dies or becomes incompetent, §

7-1-356

.

Law reviews.

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

53-7-6.
Power to borrow money, make and fulfill contracts, provide legal counsel, continue decedent’s business, and perform other acts.

Except as otherwise provided in the will or ordered by the probate court, a personal representative is authorized:

To borrow money and to bind the estate by the execution of a promissory note for money borrowed and to pledge any or all the property of the estate for the payment of such a promissory note by mortgage, trust deed, deed to secure debt, or other security instrument, for the purpose of paying any gift, estate, inheritance, income, sales, or ad valorem taxes due the United States, the state, or any municipality or county of the state that constitute a claim or demand against the estate; provided, however, that a personal representative who desires to borrow money shall file a petition with the probate court, setting forth the facts and specifying the amount to be borrowed, the purpose for which the same shall be used, the rate of interest to be paid, the property to be pledged as security and the period of time over which the loan is to be repaid and, upon service of notice of the petition, an order granting leave to borrow the money and encumber the estate shall be entered and such order shall be binding, final, and conclusive as to all interested parties;

To make contracts for labor or service for the benefit of the estate upon such terms as the personal representative deems best and all such contracts made in good faith shall be a charge upon and bind the estate whenever such contracts are approved by the probate court after service of notice;

To fulfill, as far as possible, the executory contracts and comply with the executed contracts of the decedent, including contracts for the sale of land or bonds to make title to land, and shall have a corresponding right to demand the same of parties contracted with; provided, however, that if the personal skill of the decedent entered into the consideration of the contract and the decedent’s death renders execution impossible, the contract, though entire, shall be considered divisible and closed at the decedent’s death and any partial execution by the decedent shall authorize and require a corresponding compliance by the other contracting party;

To provide competent legal counsel for the estate according to the needs of the estate and, in such cases, either the personal representative or the attorney employed may, by petition to the probate court and citation served on the other, obtain a judgment fixing the attorney’s fees and expenses;

To continue the business of the decedent for the 12 months following qualification of the personal representative, after which the personal representative may petition for permission to continue the business under such terms and conditions as the probate court may specify after service of notice; and

To petition the probate court for permission to perform such other acts as may be in the best interests of the estate after service of notice.

Service of notice of any petition to the probate court under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title. The probate court, in its discretion, may, but shall not be required to, conduct a hearing on any such petition.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-38/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a); in subsection (a), inserted “or ordered by the probate court” in the introductory language, substituted “that” for “which” and “service of notice” for “notice and hearing” in paragraph (a)(1), added “after service of notice” at the end of paragraph (a)(2), substituted “and citation” for “duly” in paragraph (a)(4), and inserted “after service of notice” in paragraphs (a)(5) and (a)(6); and added subsection (b).

Cross references.

Substitution of parties to contract generally, §

13-4-20

.

Impossibility as excuse from performance,
§

13-4-21

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was inserted after “final” near the end of paragraph (1).

53-7-7.
Disposition of income received during administration.

Except as otherwise provided in the will, income received by an executor during the period of administration from property that is used to pay debts, taxes, expenses of administration, general testamentary gifts, and other expenses chargeable to corpus shall be paid to the income beneficiaries of the residuum of the estate; provided, however, that nothing contained in this Code section shall alter or repeal Code Section 53-4-60.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-8.
Support and education of minor heirs and beneficiaries without conservators.

Whenever a personal representative has paid all the debts of the decedent and all claims against the estate, and property due minor heirs or beneficiaries for whom no one applies to be conservator is left in the personal representative’s hands, the personal representative may, under the direction of the probate court, apply so much of the minor’s share of the decedent’s estate as may be necessary for support and education as conservators are allowed by law to do.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-39/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “conservator” for “guardian” and “conservators” for “guardians” in this Code section.